Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1230
Wireless infrastructure provider, defined.

Wireless infrastructure provider means any person, including a person authorized to provide telecommunications service in the State of Nebraska, when acting to build or install wireless communication transmission equipment, wireless facilities, or wireless support structures, but that is not a wireless services provider.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 30.